Georgia statutes. TITLE 29 Guardian and Ward
CHAPTER 6 Judges of Probate Courts as Custodians of Certain Funds

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that: “all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

29-6-1.
Judges of probate courts as custodians of certain funds; authority to collect debts.

The judges of the probate courts are, in their discretion, made the legal custodians and distributors of all moneys up to $15,000.00 due and owing to any minor or incapacitated adult who is in need of a conservator but who has no legal and qualified conservator; and the judges are authorized to receive and collect all such moneys arising from insurance policies, benefit societies, legacies, inheritances, or any other source. Without any appointment or qualifying order, the judge is authorized to take charge of the moneys or funds of the minor or adult by virtue of the judge’s office as judge of the probate court in the county of residence of the minor or adult; provided, however, that notice shall be given to the living parents of a minor, if any, or the guardian of an adult, if any. The certificate of the judge that no legally qualified conservator has been appointed shall be conclusive and shall be sufficient authority to justify any debtor in making payment on claims made by the judge.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-6-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 16/SB 534.

29-6-2.
Employment of counsel; payment of counsel’s fees.

The judge of the probate court is authorized, in the judge’s discretion, to employ counsel to bring an action to recover any amount due to a minor or adult described in Code Section 29-6-1, in the minor’s or adult’s name or in the name of the judge as custodian, in any court having jurisdiction thereof. The judge of the probate court shall have authority to pay to counsel a reasonable fee out of the funds collected for counsel’s services in the proceeding which were necessary to enforce the right of the minor or adult.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-6-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-6-3.
Record-keeping requirements of probate judge.

It shall be the duty of the judge of the probate court to keep a properly indexed complete record of all money received by the judge for minors or adults by virtue of the judge’s services under Code Section 29-6-1. The record shall show from what source the funds were derived and to whom and for what the money was paid. The record shall be open for inspection by the public.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-6-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-6-4.
Expenditure of minor’s funds.

The judge of the probate court who, pursuant to Code Section 29-6-1, receives funds due and owing a minor or adult is authorized and directed to pay from the funds so received whatever amount the judge may think necessary for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the minor or adult, as well as the funeral and burial expenses of the minor or adult, in case of the individual’s death, as in the judge’s opinion may be proper and right. The expenditures made by the judge shall be final and no liability shall attach to the judge or the judge’s bond by reason of the expenditures when made in good faith.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-6-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-6-5.
Ordering of conservatorship.

In appropriate cases, the judge of the probate court who holds property or funds pursuant to this chapter may order that a conservatorship be established in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 3 or 5 of this title and shall distribute any or all of such property or funds to the conservator.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-6-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-6-6.
Requirement to deposit excess funds in FDIC insured account.

When any funds due and owing a minor or adult come into the hands of the judge of the probate court and the funds are not needed for the support, care, education, health, and welfare of the minor or adult, it shall be the duty of the judge to place the funds in an account insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in the name of the judge as custodian for the minor or adult. There shall be no further liability against the judge or the judge’s bond when the deposit is made in good faith.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-6-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-6-7.
Compensation of judges.

The judges of the probate courts shall receive as compensation for their services under Code Section 29-6-1 the fee specified in subsection (j) of Code Section 15-9-60.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-6-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-6-8.
Bonding requirements.

Judges of the probate courts shall be held accountable on their official bonds for the faithful discharge of their duties pursuant to Code Section 29-6-1 as custodians and for the proper distribution of funds coming into their hands as such custodians. It is the judge’s responsibility to increase his or her official bond if necessary.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-6-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1.

29-6-9.
Circumstances under which custodial property shall be returned.

The judge shall turn over all custodial property held pursuant to this chapter to:

A conservator if the custodial funds exceed $15,000.00;

A minor upon reaching the age of majority;

A former incapacitated adult upon restoration to capacity;

The personal representative of a deceased minor or incapacitated adult; or

The Department of Revenue four years after the death of a minor or incapacitated adult if no proceedings are commenced on that individual’s estate or four years after the date a minor who cannot be located would have reached the age of majority.

History.

Code 1981, §

29-6-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 805, § 17/SB 534.